Hawaii statutes.
[§445-90.5] Exemption. A facility
owned or used by a government agency or by a nonprofit agency which is
registered with the department of commerce and consumer affairs and providing
services by contract for a government agency, shall be exempt from this
chapter. [L 1987, c 333, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next